District of Columbia statutes.
38-2804

Allocation of funds to each school system.

The District of Columbia Public Schools and its Chief Financial Officer shall, by October 1, 1998, provide to the Council of the District of Columbia a comprehensive Fiscal Year 1999 budget displaying in detail the amount of funds to be applied to each school system function and the amount of funds to be expected by each individual school. This budget shall state all underlying budget assumptions including, but not limited to, average salaries.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1105, 45 DCR 7193

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-154.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter see notes to § 38-2801.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1B 1981 Ed., see notes following § 38-2801.